Colorado, session 2026A, HB1332.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 2-2-1601 as follows:
2-2-1601. Legislative department cash fund - redistricting
accounts - creation - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH FUND IS A RESERVE FOR THE
LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT THAT IS PRIMARILY FUNDED THROUGH
REVERSIONS OF UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS TO THE LEGISLATIVE
DEPARTMENT;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE USES THE
MONEY IN THE FUND TO:
(I) RENOVATE AND MAINTAIN THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND
SENATE CHAMBERS, THE OLD STATE LIBRARY, THE OLD SUPREME COURT,
COMMITTEE ROOMS IN THE STATE CAPITOL AND LEGISLATIVE SERVICES
BUILDING, THE STATE CAPITOL ANNEX BUILDING, AND OFFICES FOR
LEGISLATORS AND STAFF FROM THE HOUSE, SENATE, AND LEGISLATIVE
SERVICE AGENCIES;
(II) PAY FOR LEGISLATIVE SECURITY AND SAFETY EXPENSES,
INCLUDING TRAINING;
(III) MAKE THE STATE CAPITOL MORE ACCESSIBLE, SUCH AS A
PROJECT TO INSTALL A VERTICAL LIFT RAMP IN THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES SO THAT ALL LEGISLATORS ARE ABLE TO BE ON THE DIAS
AND TAKE THE GAVEL;
(IV) PAY FOR REDISTRICTING EXPENSES;
(V) PAY FOR THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT'S CRITICAL
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY LIFE-CYCLE COSTS, INCLUDING SOFTWARE,
HARDWARE, AND INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(VI) ALLOW THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT TO PAY FOR
UNFORESEEN EXPENSES DURING EMERGENCIES, SUCH AS A GLOBAL HEALTH
PANDEMIC;
(c) BY CREATING A FUND LIMIT, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY INTENDS
TO ENSURE THAT THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT HAS SUFFICIENT MONEY TO
ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT TO ANNUALLY PAY FOR ONGOING AND
UNEXPECTED EXPENSES, BUT NOT MORE; AND
(d) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHOULD CONTINUE TO PRIORITIZE
THE AVAILABLE MONEY IN THE FUND FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AND
CAPITAL NEEDS.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

(a) "CONGRESSIONAL ACCOUNT" MEANS THE CONGRESSIONAL
REDISTRICTING ACCOUNT CREATED IN THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH
FUND IN SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) "FUND" MEANS THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH FUND
CREATED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) "FUND LIMIT" MEANS:
(I) FOR THE STATE FISCAL YEAR COMMENCING ON JULY 1, 2025,
EIGHT MILLION DOLLARS; AND
(II) FOR EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE FUND LIMIT FOR
THE PRIOR STATE FISCAL YEAR, PROPORTIONALLY ADJUSTED BY THE
PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE TOTAL APPROPRIATION TO THE LEGISLATIVE
DEPARTMENT MADE IN THE LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION BILL FOR THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(d) "LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNT" MEANS THE LEGISLATIVE
REDISTRICTING ACCOUNT CREATED IN THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH
FUND IN SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) "LEGISLATIVE SERVICE AGENCY" MEANS THE OFFICE OF
LEGISLATIVE LEGAL SERVICES, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF, OFFICE OF THE
STATE AUDITOR, OR STAFF OF THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE.
(3) (a) THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH FUND IS CREATED IN
THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, THE SENATE, OR ANY LEGISLATIVE SERVICE AGENCY
ACCEPTS AS GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS; COLLECTS; OR OTHERWISE
RECEIVES FROM PRIVATE AND PUBLIC SOURCES, BUT EXCLUDES MONEY
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) MONEY THAT REVERTS TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) MONEY RECEIVED BY THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE LEGAL
SERVICES OR A LEGISLATIVE CUSTODIAN FOR FEES CHARGED FOR THE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

RESEARCH AND RETRIEVAL OF PUBLIC RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
"COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(b) MONEY COLLECTED OR RECEIVED FROM THE FOLLOWING
SOURCES IS NOT CREDITED TO THE FUND:
(I) MONEY GENERATED FROM THE SALE OF BILL BOXES, LEGISLATIVE
DIRECTORIES, AND PUBLICATIONS AND OTHER SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE
PRINT SHOP;
(II) MONEY RECEIVED FROM VARIOUS DEPARTMENTS FOR AUDITS
AND STUDIES;
(III) MONEY RECEIVED AS PAYMENT OF COSTS AND FEES PURSUANT
TO SECTION 2-5-118 (2) OR (2.5); AND
(IV) MONEY GENERATED FROM THE SALE OF PUBLICATIONS AND
MEMORABILIA RELATING TO THE STATE CAPITOL BUILDING PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-82-108 (3)(f)(I).
(c) THE CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING ACCOUNT AND THE
LEGISLATIVE REDISTRICTING ACCOUNT ARE CREATED IN THE FUND. THE
CONGRESSIONAL AND LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNTS CONSIST OF ANY MONEY
APPROPRIATED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE ACCOUNTS AND ANY MONEY
RECEIVED BY THE INDEPENDENT CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION, CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44 OF ARTICLE V OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION; THE INDEPENDENT LEGISLATIVE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION, CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 46 OF ARTICLE V OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION; OR THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL RELATED TO
REDISTRICTING.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, MONEY
APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT
FOR A STATE FISCAL YEAR THAT IS UNEXPENDED OR UNENCUMBERED AS OF
THE CLOSE OF THE STATE FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOT REVERT TO THE GENERAL
FUND AND THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY TO THE
FUND; EXCEPT THAT THE AMOUNT THAT REVERTS TO THE FUND IN A STATE
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOT CAUSE THE BALANCE IN THE FUND TO EXCEED THE
FUND LIMIT.
(b) IF, AT THE END OF A STATE FISCAL YEAR, AFTER TRANSFERRING
ANY REVERSIONS TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF
THIS SECTION AND AFTER CREDITING THE INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED
FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, THE
BALANCE IN THE FUND EXCEEDS THE FUND LIMIT, THEN THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE EXCESS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(c) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ANY UNEXPENDED
MONEY REMAINING IN THE CONGRESSIONAL AND LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNTS AS
OF JUNE 30 OF ANY YEAR ENDING IN 2 TO THE FUND; EXCEPT THAT, IF ANY
AMOUNT OF THE TRANSFER WOULD CAUSE THE BALANCE IN THE FUND TO
EXCEED THE FUND LIMIT, THEN THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
THAT AMOUNT TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(d) MONEY IN THE CONGRESSIONAL AND LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNTS
AND GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS ARE EXCLUDED FROM THE BALANCE IN
THE FUND FOR PURPOSES OF THE CALCULATIONS IN THIS SUBSECTION (4).
(5) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2025, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-114 (1), THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND
INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND, INCLUDING THE CONGRESSIONAL AND
LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNTS, TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(6) (a) EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION,
STATE MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL TO PAY FOR EXPENSES
OF THE LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT OF THE STATE OF COLORADO.
(b) MONEY IN THE CONGRESSIONAL ACCOUNT IS CONTINUOUSLY
APPROPRIATED TO THE INDEPENDENT CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION AND TO THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF TO PAY FOR THE
EXPENSE OF REDISTRICTING THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS IN THE STATE.
MONEY IN THE LEGISLATIVE ACCOUNT IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO
THE INDEPENDENT LEGISLATIVE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION AND TO THE
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF TO PAY FOR THE EXPENSE OF REDISTRICTING
THE STATE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS IN THE STATE.
(c) THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE SENATE, AND LEGISLATIVE
SERVICE AGENCIES SHALL EXPEND MONEY CONSISTENT WITH ANY TERMS
AND CONDITIONS IMPOSED AS A CONDITION OF RECEIVING SUCH MONEY AS
GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS.
(7) THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE SENATE, AND ANY
LEGISLATIVE SERVICE AGENCY MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR ANY
PURPOSE AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(8) (a) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TWELVE MILLION SIX HUNDRED SEVENTY-FOUR THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED
SIXTY-SIX DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (8) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1707, amend (6)
as follows:
2-3-1707. Artificial intelligence impact task force - creation -
membership - duties - compensation - staff support - report -
definitions - repeal.
(6) Staff support. The director of research of the legislative council
may supply staff assistance to the task force as the director of research
deems appropriate, subject to available appropriations. The task force may
also accept gifts, grants, and donations for staff support from the private
sector, which gifts, grants, and donations shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer, who shall credit the money to the legislative department cash fund
created in section 2-2-1601 (1)(a) SECTION 2-2-1601 (3)(a).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-30-1310, amend
(1)(d)(V) as follows:
24-30-1310. Funding for capital construction, controlled
maintenance, or capital renewal - definitions.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(d) "Cash fund" does not include:
(V) The legislative department cash fund created in section
2-2-1601 (1)(a) SECTION 2-2-1601 (3)(a) and the LEGISLATIVE redistricting
account AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING ACCOUNTS of the legislative
department cash fund created in section 2-2-1601 (2.5) SECTION 2-2-1601
(3)(c); or
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-127, amend
(1)(c)(V) as follows:
24-37.5-127. Funding for technology life-cycle costs -
information technology annual depreciation-lease equivalent payments
- fiscal impact analysis - definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) "Cash fund" does not include:
(V) The legislative department cash fund created in section
2-2-1601 (1)(a) SECTION 2-2-1601 (3)(a) and the legislative redistricting
account AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING ACCOUNTS created in section
2-2-1601 (2.5) SECTION 2-2-1601 (3)(c).
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1332

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1332